Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1375
Crematory operation; limitations.

(1) No person shall be permitted in a crematory, unless authorized by the crematory authority, while any human remains are in the crematory awaiting cremation, being cremated, or being removed from the cremation chamber.

(2) The human remains of more than one person shall not be simultaneously cremated within the same cremation chamber unless the crematory authority has received specific written authorization from the authorizing agent for the human remains to be so cremated.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 21.